Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5318.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 4o. (1) The Except as otherwise limited under this
subsection and subject to subsection (2), the sale of the first
$10,000.00 of tangible personal property in a calendar year for
fund-raising purposes by a school, church, hospital, parent
cooperative preschool, or nonprofit organization that has a tax-
exempt status under section 4q(1)(a) or (b) and that has aggregate
sales at retail in the calendar year of less than $25,000.00 are
ERE H04811'25 (H-1) 4hdur2


for the purpose of raising funds for the charitable purpose of the
organization is exempt from the tax under this act. The exemption
under this subsection is limited to $75,000.00 in aggregate sales
of tangible personal property for each individual fund-raising
event, which amount must be adjusted for inflation as provided in
subsection (5).
(2) A club, association, auxiliary, or other organization
affiliated with a school, church, hospital, parent cooperative
preschool, or nonprofit organization with a tax-exempt status under
section 4q(1)(a) or (b) is not considered a separate person for
purposes of this the exemption under subsection (1). As used in
this section, "school" means each elementary, middle, junior, or
high school site within a local school district that represents a
district attendance area as established by the board of the local
school district.
(3) Except as otherwise limited under this subsection and
subject to subsection (4), the sale of tangible personal property
by a veterans' organization that is exempt from federal income tax
under section 501(c)(19) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26
USC 501, for the purpose of raising funds for the benefit of an
active duty service member or a veteran is exempt from the tax
under this act. The exemption under this subsection is limited to
$25,000.00 $75,000.00 in aggregate sales of tangible personal
property for each individual fund-raising event, which amount must
be adjusted for inflation as provided in subsection (5).
(4) A club, association, auxiliary, or other organization
affiliated with a veterans' organization that is exempt from
federal income tax under section 501(c)(19) of the internal revenue
code of 1986, 26 USC 501, is not considered a separate person for
ERE H04811'25 (H-1) 4hdur2


purposes of this the exemption under subsection (3).
(5) At the end of each calendar year after the effective date
of the amendatory act that added this subsection, the state
treasurer shall adjust the amounts in subsections (1) and (3) by an
amount determined by the state treasurer to reflect the cumulative
annual percentage change in the Consumer Price Index. If the
cumulative annual percentage change in the Consumer Price Index is
negative, then the adjustment for that calendar year is zero.
(6) As used in this subsection:section:
(a) "Active duty" means active duty pursuant to an executive
order of the President of the United States, an act of Congress, or
an order of the governor.
(b) "Armed Forces of the United States" means the Army, Air
Force, Navy, Marine Corps, Coast Guard, or other military force
designated by Congress as a part of the Armed Forces of the United
States.
(c) "Consumer Price Index" means the most comprehensive index
of consumer prices available for this state from the Bureau of
Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(d) "Fund-raising event" means a meeting, gathering, activity,
or occasion, regardless of whether conducted in person, virtually,
or through hybrid means and whether conducted on a single day or
over a period of time, at or through which a person solicits,
receives, collects, encourages, promotes, or facilitates the making
of contributions, donations, pledges, or other items of monetary or
in-kind value for the benefit of a person described in subsection
(1) or (3). Fund-raising event includes, but is not limited to, all
of the following:
(i) A reception, dinner, or banquet.
ERE H04811'25 (H-1) 4hdur2


(ii) An auction, raffle, or sale of goods or services to raise
money.
(iii) An online campaign.
(iv) A ticketed event.
(v) Any other event for which attendance, participation, or
recognition is conditioned on or associated with the making or
solicitation of a contribution or through which contributions are
solicited or received by purchase of a ticket, payment of an
attendance fee, making a donation, or purchase of goods or
services.
(e) "School" means each elementary, middle, junior, or high
school site within a local school district that represents a
district attendance area as established by the board of the local
school district.
(f) (c) "Service member" means a member of the Armed Forces of
the United States, a reserve branch of the Armed Forces of the
United States, or the National Guard.
(g) (d) "Veteran" means any of the following:
(i) A person An individual who served on active duty in the
Armed Forces of the United States for a period of more than 180
days and separated from the Armed Forces of the United States in a
manner other than a dishonorable discharge.
(ii) A person An individual discharged or released from active
duty because of a service-related disability.
(iii) A An individual who meets all of the following
requirements:
(A) Was a member of a reserve branch of the Armed Forces of
the United States at the time he or she when the individual was
ordered to active duty pursuant to subtitle E of title 10 of the
ERE H04811'25 (H-1) 4hdur2


United States Code, under 10 USC 10001 to 18506. , who served
(B) Served on active duty during a period of war, or in a
campaign or expedition for which a campaign badge is authorized. ,
and was
(C) Was released from active duty in a manner other than a
dishonorable discharge.
Sec. 4q. (1) A Subject to subsection (5), a sale of tangible
personal property not for resale to any of the following , subject
to subsection (5), is exempt from the tax under this act:
(a) A health, welfare, educational, cultural arts, charitable,
or benevolent organization not operated for profit that has been
issued an exemption ruling letter to purchase items exempt from tax
before July 17, 1998 signed by the administrator of the sales, use,
and withholding taxes division of the department.
(b) An organization not operated for profit and exempt from
federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(4) (4) of the
internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501.
(c) An organization not operated for profit and exempt from
federal income tax under section 501(c)(19) of the internal revenue
code, 26 USC 501.
(2) The exemptions provided for in subsection (1) do not apply
to any of the following:
(a) Sales of tangible personal property and sales of vehicles
licensed for use on public highways that are not used primarily to
carry out the purposes of the organization or to raise funds or
obtain resources necessary to carry out the purposes of the
organization as stated in the bylaws or articles of incorporation
of the exempt entity.
(b) Sales of tangible personal property or vehicles used for
ERE H04811'25 (H-1) 4hdur2


purposes of raising funds or obtaining resources if the sales price
exceeds the following:
(i) For an organization exempt under subsection (1)(a) or (b),
$5,000.00.tangible personal property, $60,000.00, adjusted for
inflation as provided in subsection (6).
(ii) For an organization exempt under subsection (1)(c),
$25,000.00.vehicles, $75,000.00, adjusted for inflation as provided
in subsection (6).
(3) At the time of the transfer of the tangible personal
property exempt under subsection (1), the transferee shall do 1 of
the following:
(a) Present the exemption ruling letter signed by the
administrator of the sales, use, and withholding taxes division of
the department certifying that the property is to be used or
consumed in connection with the operation of the organization.
(b) Present a signed statement, on a form approved by the
department, stating that the property is to be used or consumed in
connection with the operation of the organization, to carry out the
purpose or purposes of the organization, or to raise funds or
obtain resources necessary for the operation of the organization,
that the organization qualifies as an exempt organization under
this section, and that the sales price of any single item of
tangible personal property or vehicle purchased for purposes of
raising funds or obtaining resources does not exceed the applicable
cap amount established in subsection (2)(b). The transferee shall
also provide to the transferor a copy of the federal exemption
letter. However, a copy of the federal exemption letter is not
required if the organization is exempt from filing an application
for exempt status with the internal revenue service.Internal
ERE H04811'25 (H-1) 4hdur2


Revenue Service.
(4) The letter provided under subsection (3)(a) and the
statement with the accompanying letter provided under subsection
(3)(b) shall be accepted by all courts as prima facie evidence of
the exemption and the statement shall must provide that if the
claim for tax exemption is disallowed, the transferee will
reimburse the transferor for the amount of tax involved.
(5) The tangible personal property under subsection (1) is
exempt only to the extent that the property is used to carry out
the purposes of the organization or to raise funds or obtain
resources necessary to carry out the purposes of the organization
as stated in the organization's bylaws or articles of
incorporation. The exemption for purposes of carrying out the
purposes of the organization as stated in its bylaws or articles of
incorporation is limited to the percentage of exempt use to total
use determined by a reasonable formula or method approved by the
department. The exemption for any single item of tangible personal
property or vehicle used to raise funds or obtain resources is
limited to a sales price that does not exceed $5,000.00 for an
organization exempt under subsection (1)(a) or (b) and $25,000.00
for an organization exempt under subsection (1)(c).$60,000.00 for a
single item of tangible personal property and $75,000.00 for a
vehicle, adjusted for inflation as provided in subsection (6).
(6) At the end of each calendar year after the effective date
of the amendatory act that added this subsection, the state
treasurer shall adjust the amounts in subsections (2) and (5) by an
amount determined by the state treasurer to reflect the cumulative
annual percentage change in the Consumer Price Index. If the
cumulative annual percentage change in the Consumer Price Index is
ERE H04811'25 (H-1) 4hdur2


negative, then the adjustment for that calendar year is zero. As
used in this subsection, "Consumer Price Index" means the most
comprehensive index of consumer prices available for this state
from the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department
of Labor.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days
after the date it is enacted into law.
Final Page
ERE H04811'25 (H-1) 4hdur2